Utah statutes.
20A-2-101.3.   Convicted misdemeanants -- Restoration of right to vote or hold office.

(1)  As used in this section, "misdemeanant" means a person convicted of a misdemeanor for an offense under this title.

(2)  A misdemeanant's right to register to vote and to vote in an election is restored when the misdemeanant:

(a)  is sentenced to probation; or

(b)  has successfully completed the term of incarceration to which the misdemeanant was sentenced.

(3)  A misdemeanant's right to hold elective office is restored when:

(a)  the misdemeanor for an offense under this title is expunged as provided in Title 77, Chapter 40, Utah Expungement Act; or

(b) (i)  five years have passed since the date of the misdemeanant's most recent misdemeanor conviction of an offense under this title;

(ii)  the misdemeanant has paid all court-ordered restitution and fines; and

(iii)  for each misdemeanor conviction that has not been expunged, the misdemeanant has:

(A)  completed probation in relation to the misdemeanor; or

(B)  successfully completed the term of incarceration associated with the misdemeanor.

